Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 6. Practice of Professional Engineering and Professional Land Surveying

§ 33-29-601.
Professional seal.

The board shall adopt a seal for the use of professional engineers and professional land surveyors.

Whenever the professional seal is applied, the licensee’s signature and the date shall also be included.

The professional seal, signature and date shall be placed on all final designs, specifications, maps, land surveys, reports, plats, drawings and plans filed or recorded pursuant to W.S.

33-29-801

.

The application of a professional seal shall constitute certification that:

The work was done by the professional licensee or under his responsible charge; and

The licensee is competent in the subject matter.

A licensee shall not:

Permit the use of his seal by another; or

Use his seal when his license has expired, is inactive or has been revoked or suspended.

An individual who is not licensed shall not use the seal of a licensee.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-29-602.
Practice through business entities; registration.

Professional engineers and professional land surveyors may practice professional engineering or professional land surveying through a business entity provided:

The business entity has registered with the board;

The business entity has submitted the following to the board:

A description of the engineering or land surveying services to be practiced in the state; and

A designation of an individual or individuals in responsible charge. A change in the individual or individuals in responsible charge shall be filed with the board within thirty (30) days of the change.

All final maps, plats, plans, designs and other documents filed or recorded under W.S.

33-29-801

shall be dated and bear the signature and seal of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor in responsible charge of the work; and

All personnel of the business entity who act on its behalf as engineers or land surveyors in this state shall be licensed professional engineers or licensed professional land surveyors or shall be exempted from the license requirement under W.S. 33-29-604(a)(iii). No business entity shall be relieved of responsibility for the conduct or acts of its employees, officers or agents by reason of its compliance with this act. Nor shall any individual engaged in engineering or land surveying be relieved of responsibility for engineering or land surveying services performed by reason of his employment or relationship with a business entity.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-603.
Public works.

Drawings, plans, specifications and estimates for public works of the state or a political subdivision of the state involving professional engineering shall be prepared by or under the personal direction of a professional engineer. The construction of the engineering works shall be executed under the direct supervision of a professional engineer.

Surveys or maps for public works of the state or a political subdivision of the state shall be prepared by or under the personal direction of a professional land surveyor. The surveying work shall be executed under the direct supervision of a professional land surveyor.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-29-604.
Exemptions and limitations.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to:

An officer or employee of the United States practicing within the scope of his authority and employment;

An officer or employee of the state of Wyoming performing regulatory reviews within the scope of his authority and employment provided the officer or employee shall not represent himself to be a licensed professional engineer or licensed professional surveyor unless he is so licensed and except when filing water right petitions with the state of Wyoming as provided in title 41 of the Wyoming statutes;

An individual working for a business entity or licensee provided a licensee exercises responsible charge over all final designs, drawings, maps, plats and plans filed under W.S.

33-29-801

;

A utility company or telecommunications company regulated by the Wyoming public service commission or the company’s employees practicing within the scope of their employment and authority;

An individual who performs actions described in W.S. 33-29-201(a)(viii)(A) upon lands owned or leased by him or upon lands owned or leased by an entity, which is not a publicly traded corporation, of which he owns an interest; or

An irrigation company or employee of an irrigation company when determining elevations and distances necessary to market equipment.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)